West Virginia, session 2026, SB289.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Insurance Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 22, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-2-10 of this code, relating to the Insurance Commission (premium financing for life insurance for college students, 114 CSR 07), is authorized.